Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20219-1111
Game of chance; cheating; gaming device; manipulation; penalties.

(1) Any person who knowingly cheats at any game of chance is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

(2) Any person who manipulates, with the intent to cheat, any component of a gaming device in a manner contrary to the designed and normal operational purpose of the component, including varying the pull of the handle of a gaming machine, with knowledge that the manipulation affects the outcome of the game or with knowledge of any event that affects the outcome of the game, is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 2021, LB561, § 35.